Connecticut, session 2026, HB05335.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Energy and Environmental Protection shall develop and post for
members of the public, on or before January 31, 2027, the capacity limit
of Burr Pond State Park. Such capacity limit shall be determined
utilizing the following factors: (1) The number of visitors that can be
safely supervised, taking into account the staffing at said state park; (2)
the number of swimmers that can be safely supervised, taking into
account the lifeguard staffing in said state park; (3) the parking capacity
at said state park; (4) the public restroom facility capacity at such state
park; (5) the pedestrian and vehicular traffic on any state highway
without a sidewalk that leads to said state park that threatens, or is
reasonably likely to threaten, public safety by pedestrians walking on
the side of the highway or by impeding the travel of emergency vehicles
because of the high volume of vehicles parked or moving on the
highway; and (6) the authority of the commissioner to utilize the
number of vehicles entering said state park as a proxy for the number of
LCO No. 2279 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5335
visitors at said state park. The commissioner shall coordinate with
municipal and state law enforcement agencies to implement traffic
control efforts to minimize public safety concerns on local roadways and
any state highway outside such state park and may close such state park
to new entrants when such capacity is reached, regardless of the means
by which patrons enter such state park.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section